Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska52-605
Redemption.

At any time before the goods are so sold, any person claiming a right of property or possession therein may pay the claimant the amount necessary to satisfy his lien, and pay the reasonable expenses and liabilities incurred in serving notices of advertising and preparing for sale up to the time of such payment. The claimant shall deliver the goods to the person making such payment if he is a person entitled to the possession of the goods on the payment of charges thereon.

Laws 1923, c. 118, § 5, p. 282;

C.S.1929, § 52-605;

R.S.1943, § 52-605.